Massachusetts, session 194th, S3237.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the 
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game, 
may convey, amend, assign or otherwise transfer to Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC a 50-foot 
wide permanent right-of-way and easement for: (i) the construction, maintenance and operation 
of a pipeline, together with all necessary or useful appurtenances thereto; (ii) the transmission of 
natural gas and all by-products thereof; and (iii) permanent access roads necessary to access such 
facilities. The easements may be granted on the properties described in subsection (b) currently 
held for fish and wildlife conservation, natural habitat protection and associated public recreation 
purposes pursuant to Article 97 of the Amendments to the constitution of the commonwealth. 

of 5 11 The grant of the easement shall be on such terms and conditions as the commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game, 
may determine. 
(b) The easements described in subsection (a) may be granted on certain parcels of land 
more particularly described as  land located within Joint Base Cape Cod and shown on the town 
of Bourne assessors’ maps as parcel number 44.0-50-0 and parcel number 17.0-3-0. The 
easements and permanent access roads are approximately 5.272 acres, as shown as “Proposed 
New Perm. Easement” and “Perm. Access Rd” on Sheets 1-5, and 17 of 17 of the plans entitled, 
“Area of Permanent Easement & Temporary Workspace, Commonwealth of Massachusetts,” 
Tracts G-31-MA-BA-023 and G-32-MA-BA-001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. 
and dated August 1, 2025; and shown as “Proposed New Perm. Easement” and “Perm. Access 
Rd” on  Sheets 2, 3, 6, and 7 of 7 of the plans entitled “Area of Permanent Easement & 
Temporary Workspace, Commonwealth of Massachusetts” Tracts G-31-MA-BA-025 and G-32-
MA-BA-001.001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. and dated August 1, 2025. 
SECTION 2. In consideration for the conveyance authorized in section 1 and to ensure a 
no net loss of land subject to Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the 
Commonwealth, Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC shall convey to the commonwealth an 
approximately 7.00 acre parcel of land shown as “Proposed Conveyance to the Department of 
Fish and Game” on a plan entitled “Plan of Land Stop & Shop Supermarket Company, LLC 
Bourne, MA” dated May 20, 2026, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc., for the purposes 
of fish and wildlife conservation, natural habitat protection and associated public recreation in 
accordance with said Article 97.   

of 5 33  SECTION 3. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the 
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game, 
may convey, amend, assign or otherwise transfer to Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC a 50-foot 
wide permanent right-of-way and easement for: (i) the construction, maintenance and operation 
of a pipeline, together with all necessary or useful appurtenances thereto; (ii) the transmission of 
natural gas and all by-products thereof; and (iii) permanent access roads necessary to access such 
facilities and temporary workspaces necessary for the construction of said facilities. The 
easements may be granted on the properties described in subsection (b) currently held for fish 
and wildlife conservation, natural habitat protection and associated public recreation purposes 
pursuant to h Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the Commonwealth. The grant 
of the easement shall be on such terms and conditions as the commissioner of capital asset 
management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game, may 
determine. 
(b) The easements described in subsection (a) may be granted on certain parcels of land 
more particularly described and located within Joint Base Cape Cod and shown on the town of 
Bourne assessors’ maps as parcel number 44.0-50-0, and parcel number 17.0-3-0. The easements 
and permanent access roads are shown as, “Proposed New Perm. Easement”; and “Perm. Access 
Rd” on the plans entitled “Area of Permanent Easement & Temporary Workspace, 
Commonwealth of Massachusetts” Tracts G-31-MA-BA-023 and G-32-MA-BA-001, prepared 
by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. and dated August 1, 2025; and shown as “Proposed New 
Perm. Easement” and “Perm. Access Rd” on the plans entitled, “Area of Permanent Easement & 
Temporary Workspace, Commonwealth of Massachusetts,” Tracts G-31-MA-BA-025 and G-32-

of 5 56 MA-BA-001.001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. and dated August 1, 2025; and (ii) 
shown on the town of Bourne assessor’s map as tax parcel number 10.0_7_0,  more particularly 
shown on the plan entitled, “Area of Permanent Easement & Temporary Workspace, 
Commonwealth of Massachusetts,” Tract G-31-MA-BA-007, prepared by Vanasse Hangen 
Brustlin, Inc. and dated August 1, 2025. 
SECTION 4. (a) The value of the easements described in sections 1 and 3 and the value 
of the property interest to be conveyed to the commonwealth pursuant to section 2 shall be 
determined by an independent appraisal prepared in accordance with the usual and customary 
professional appraisal practice by a qualified appraiser commissioned by the commissioner of 
capital asset management and maintenance. The commissioner may, in consultation with the 
commissioner of fish and game, accept an appraisal of the easements and property interest 
conducted prior to the effective date of this act. The commissioner of capital asset management 
and maintenance shall submit the appraisal to the inspector general for review and comment. The 
inspector general shall review and approve the appraisal and the review shall include an 
examination of the methodology used for the appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a 
report of the review and file the report with the commissioner of capital asset management and 
maintenance.  The commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisals and the inspector general’s 
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on state 
administration and regulatory oversight before the execution of the conveyances. 
(b) Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC shall compensate the commonwealth in an amount 
that shall be greater than or equal to the full and fair market value or the value in use of the 
easements  authorized in sections 1 and 3, whichever is greater, as determined by the 
independent appraisals. The commonwealth shall not be obligated to pay any consideration to 

of 5 79 Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC if the appraised value of any parcels or interests conveyed to 
the commonwealth exceeds the value of the easements authorized in said sections 1 and 3. All 
money paid to the commonwealth by Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC as a result of the 
conveyance of the easements authorized by this act shall be deposited in the Biodiversity Fund 
established in section 35D ½ of chapter 10 of the General Laws to be used for future land 
acquisition by the department of fish and game. 
(c) If the independent appraisal shows that the fair market value or value in use, 
whichever is greater, of the interests described in section 1 are not equal to or greater than the 
fair market value or value in use, whichever is greater, of the property interest to be conveyed to 
the commonwealth pursuant to section 2, then Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC shall 
compensate the commonwealth in an amount equal to or greater than such difference in 
monetary valueAll money paid to the commonwealth by Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC as a 
result of the conveyance of the easements authorized in this act shall be deposited in the 
Biodiversity Fund established in section 35D ½ of chapter 10 of the General Laws to be used for 
future land acquisition by the department of fish and game. 
SECTION 5. Algonquin Gas Transmission LLC shall be responsible for all costs 
associated with engineering, surveys, appraisals, document preparation and other expenses 
deemed necessary by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance to effect 
the conveyances authorized by this act.